North Dakota, session 69, HB1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-43.1-03.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
57-43.1-03.3. Refund to emergency- Emergency medical services operation - Fire
department.
1. Upon application to the commissioner, the operator of an emergency medical services
operation licensed under chapter 23-27 or a fire department is entitled to a refund of taxes
paid under this chapter for motor vehicle fuel purchased and used by the emergency medical
services operation or fire department.
2. The refund provided for in this section is not subject to reduction for deposit in the agricultural
products utilization fund or the agricultural research fund.
3. For purposes of this section, "fire department" means a fire department or fire district that has
filed a certificate of existence under section 18 - 04 - 02 which has been approved .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 57-43.2-04.5 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
57-43.2-04.5. Refund to emergency- Emergency medical services operation - Fire
department.
1. Upon application to the commissioner, the operator of an emergency medical services
operation licensed under chapter 23-27 or a fire department is entitled to a refund of taxes
paid under this chapter for special fuel purchased and used by the emergency medical
services operation or fire department.
2. For purposes of this section, "fire department" means a fire department or fire district that has
filed a certificate of existence under section 18 - 04 - 02 which has been approved .
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 57-43.3-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
57-43.3-03.1. Refund to emergency- Emergency medical services operation - Fire
department.
1. Upon application to the commissioner, the operator of an emergency medical services
operation licensed under chapter 23-27 or a fire department is entitled to a refund of taxes
paid under this chapter for aviation fuel purchased and used by the emergency medical
services operation or fire department.
2. For purposes of this section, "fire department" means a fire department or fire district that has
filed a certificate of existence under section 18 - 04 - 02 which has been approved .

H. B. NO. 1281 - PAGE 2
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable events occurring after June 30,
2025.

H. B. NO. 1281 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1281.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State